Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.120

Wage assignment order—Employer's answer—Form.

The answer of the employer shall be made on forms, served on the employer with the wage assignment order, substantially as follows:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE

STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR THE

COUNTY OF . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

No. . . . . . . . . . . . .

Obligee

vs.

ANSWER

. . . . . . . . . . . .

TO WAGE

Obligor

ASSIGNMENT ORDER

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Employer

1. At the time of the service of the wage assignment order on the employer, was the above-named obligor employed by or receiving earnings or other remuneration for employment from the employer?

Yes . . . . . . No . . . . . . (check one).

2. Are there any other attachments for child support or maintenance currently in effect against the obligor?

Yes . . . . . . No . . . . . . (check one).

3. If the answer to question one is yes and the employer cannot comply with the wage assignment order, provide an explanation:

I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of Washington that the foregoing is true and correct.

. . . .

. . . .

Signature of employer

Date and place

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Signature of person

Address for future notice

answering for employer

to employer

. . . .

Connection with employer

[ 2008 c 6 s 1035; 1993 c 426 s 10; 1984 c 260 s 12.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.